Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to  the Department of Public Safety Standards and
Training, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Debt service .............................. $ 8,789,990
(2) Facilities repairs ....................... $ 1,133,830
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 80,728,081
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ... $ 322,411
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$7,967,812 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5032 (HB 5032-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5032 (HB 5032-A) Page 2